Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB334.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9730(b)(1), (2) and (3) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9730. Payment of court costs, restitution and fines.* * *(b) Procedures regarding default.--(1) If a defendant defaults in the payment of court costs, restitution or fines after imposition of sentence, the issuing authority or a senior judge or senior magisterial district judge appointed by the president judge for the purposes of this section [may] shall conduct a hearing to 123456789101112131415161718192021 determine whether the defendant is financially able to pay.(2) If the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge determines that the defendant is financially able to pay the costs, restitution or fine, the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge may enter an order for wage attachment[,] or turn the delinquent account over to a private collection agency [or impose imprisonment for nonpayment], as provided by law.* * *(3) (i) If the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge determines that the defendant is without the financial means to pay the costs, restitution or fines immediately or in a single remittance[,] without causing manifest hardship to the defendant as defined in paragraph (5), the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge [may] shall provide for payment in installments or, in the case of costs or fines, reduce or waive the costs or fines, except costs imposed under section 1101 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act. In determining the appropriate installments, reduction or waiver, the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge shall [consider the defendant's financial resources, the defendant's ability to make restitution and reparations and the nature of the burden the payment will impose on the defendant.] assign an installment payment for the costs, restitution or fines that complies with the requirements under section 9758(b) (relating to fine).20250SB0334PN0270 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) If the defendant is in default of a payment or advises the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge that default is imminent, the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge may schedule a rehearing on the payment schedule. At the rehearing the defendant has the burden of proving [changes of financial condition such that the defendant is without the means to meet the payment schedule.] that the payments are causing the defendant manifest hardship. The issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge [may extend or accelerate the schedule, leave it unaltered, reduce or waive the costs or fines, except costs imposed under section 1101 of the Crime Victims Act,] shall extend the installment payment time limitation or sentence the defendant to a period of community service as the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge finds to be just and practicable under the circumstances.(iii) If the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge determines that the defendant is without the financial means to pay the costs, restitution or fines under this paragraph, the issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge shall waive an existing collection fee under section 9730.1(b) (relating to collection of court costs, restitution and fines by private collection agency) that was not previously collected from the defendant who is determined to be without the financial means to pay the costs, restitution or fines under this 20250SB0334PN0270 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph.* * *(5) A defendant shall be considered to experience manifest hardship if any of the following apply:(i) The defendant is involuntarily unemployed and has assets less than 200% of the Federal poverty level.(ii) The defendant's household income and assets are less than 200% of the Federal poverty level.(iii) The defendant is receiving any kind of public assistance.(iv) The defendant presents evidence to the judge during the hearing that would cause a reasonable person to believe paying the full amount of the penalty would cause manifest hardship to the defendant or the defendant's dependents.(v) The defendant is unable to afford to meet the defendant's basic life needs, including food, rent or mortgage payments, utilities, medical expenses, transportation and dependent care.Section 2. Sections 9758(b) and (c) and 9772 of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 9758. Fine.* * *(b) Installment payment.--(1) Except for fines imposed under Title 34 (relating to game), the court may permit installment payments as it considers appropriate to the circumstances of the defendant, in which case its order shall specify when each installment payment is due. Installment payments for fines imposed for summary offenses under Title 34 shall not exceed one year for 20250SB0334PN0270 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 summary offenses and, except for 34 Pa.C.S. § 2522 (relating to shooting at or causing injury to human beings), shall not exceed two years for misdemeanor offenses.(2) The following shall apply to installment payments permitted under this subsection:(i) A defendant whose household income is less than or equal to 125% of the Federal poverty level may not be required to make payments until the defendant's income is more than 125% of the Federal poverty level.(ii) A defendant whose household income is more than 125% but less than 150% of the Federal poverty level may not be required to make monthly installment payments that exceed two times the hourly minimum wage for the locality.(iii) A defendant whose household income is equal to or more than 150% but less than 175% of the Federal poverty level may not be required to make monthly installment payments that exceed three times the hourly minimum wage for the locality.(iv) A defendant whose household income is greater than or equal to 175% but less than 185% of the Federal poverty level may not be required to make monthly installment payments that exceed four times the hourly minimum wage for the locality.(v) A defendant whose household income is greater than or equal to 185% but less than 200% of the Federal poverty level may not be required to make monthly installment plans that exceed five times the hourly minimum wage for the locality.(vi) If a defendant's household income is equal to 20250SB0334PN0270 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or more than 200% of the Federal poverty level, the court, issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge shall consider the evidence presented and set a payment plan that would not impose what a reasonable person would consider manifest hardship to the defendant or the defendant's dependents.(vii) A court, issuing authority, senior judge or senior magisterial district judge may deviate from the maximum monthly payment plans under this paragraph only if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence presented at the hearing that the defendant has the present ability to pay a higher amount per month without experiencing a manifest hardship.(c) Alternative sentence.--The sentence of the court may include an alternative sentence in the event of nonpayment. A person sentenced to community service under this subsection shall be assigned a minimum of one hour of service for each $20 of the unpaid balance of the fine and costs.§ 9772. Failure to pay fine.[Unless there is proof that failure to pay a fine or that portion of the fine that is due is excusable] Unless the court finds that a defendant is financially able to pay a fine or a portion of the fine that is due without causing the defendant manifest hardship, the court may after a hearing find the defendant guilty of contempt and sentence him to not more than six months imprisonment, if a term of confinement of that amount could have been imposed for the offense charged. If an alternative sentence has been imposed under section 9758(c) (relating to alternative sentence), the alternative sentence may not take effect until there has been a preliminary finding of 20250SB0334PN0270 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [non-indigency] nonindigency, and a willful failure to pay the fine.Section 3. Section 1533(a) and (b) of Title 75, amended October 31, 2024 (P.L.1143, No.138), are amended to read:§ 1533. Suspension of operating privilege for failure to respond to citation.(a) Violations within Commonwealth.--The department shall suspend the operating privilege of any person who, upon being duly notified by an issuing authority or a court of competent jurisdiction of this Commonwealth, has failed to take any of the following actions:(1) Respond to a citation or summons to appear before the issuing authority or court for a violation of this title, other than parking.(2) Pay any fine, costs or restitution imposed by the issuing authority or court for a violation of this title, other than parking. An issuing authority or court shall notify the department that a person has failed to pay any fine, costs or restitution only after making a preliminary finding of nonindigency and a willful failure to pay without causing manifest hardship.* * *(b) Violations outside Commonwealth.--The department shall suspend the operating privilege of any person who has failed to respond to a citation, summons or similar writ to appear before a court of competent jurisdiction of the United States or any state which has entered into an enforcement agreement with the department, as authorized under section 6146 (relating to enforcement agreements), for any violation of the motor vehicle laws of such state, other than parking, or who has failed to pay 20250SB0334PN0270 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any fine or costs imposed by such court upon being duly notified in accordance with the laws of such jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. A person who provides proof, satisfactory to the department, that the full amount of the fine and costs has been forwarded to and received by the court shall not be regarded as having failed to respond for the purposes of this subsection. The department may not suspend the operating privilege of a person who has failed to pay a fine or costs unless an issuing authority or court has first made a preliminary finding of nonindigency and a willful failure to pay without causing manifest hardship.* * *Section 4. Section 6504 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6504. Inability to pay fine and costs.* * *(d) Alternative sentence.--A person who is found to have a manifest hardship as provided in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9730 may be sentenced to community service in the amount of one hour for every $20 of the unpaid balance of the fine.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0334PN0270 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021